Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,100
Weights and Measures Administrative Fund; created; use; investment; lien.

The director shall collect registration, permit, laboratory, test, administrative, and inspection fees and money required to be reimbursed as provided for in the Weights and Measures Act and shall remit such funds to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit such funds to the Weights and Measures Administrative Fund, which fund is hereby created. All fees and reimbursements collected pursuant to the act and credited to the fund shall be appropriated to the uses of the department to aid in defraying the expenses of administering the act, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any unexpended balance in the Weights and Measures Administrative Fund at the close of any biennium shall, when reappropriated, be available for the uses and purposes of the fund for the succeeding biennium. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The registration, permit, laboratory, test, administrative, and inspection fees and money required to be reimbursed as provided for in the Weights and Measures Act shall constitute a lien on the weighing and measuring devices or standards required to be registered or approved for use in this state until such fees and reimbursements are paid. The director may sue for such fees and reimbursements and may seek to foreclose on any lien in the name of the state. The county attorney of the county in which the device is located or the Attorney General's office shall, upon the request of the director, take appropriate action to establish and foreclose on any such lien.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 18;

Laws 1974, LB 17, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 258, § 45;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 30;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 142;

Laws 2001, LB 541, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 161, § 7;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 101;

Laws 2016, LB909, § 17.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.